Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-4602
Act; purposes.

(1) The Pharmacy Benefit Manager Licensure and Regulation Act establishes the standards and criteria for the licensure and regulation of pharmacy benefit managers providing a claims processing service or other prescription drug or device service for a health benefit plan.

(2) The purposes of the act are to:

(a) Promote, preserve, and protect public health, safety, and welfare through effective regulation and licensure of pharmacy benefit managers;

(b) Promote the solvency of the commercial health insurance industry, the regulation of which is reserved to the states by the federal McCarran-Ferguson Act, 15 U.S.C. 1011 to 1015, as such act and sections existed on January 1, 2022, as well as provide for consumer savings and encourage fairness in prescription drug benefits;

(c) Provide for powers and duties of the director; and

(d) Prescribe monetary penalties for violations of the Pharmacy Benefit Manager Licensure and Regulation Act.

Laws 2022, LB767, § 2.